Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-122
Credential; form.

Every initial credential to practice a profession or engage in a business shall be in the form of a document under the name of the department.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 5, p. 455;

C.S.1929, § 71-204;

R.S.1943, § 71-105;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 374;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-105;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 299;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 4.